Hawaii statutes.
B. Campaign
Spending Commission

[§11-311] Campaign spending commission
established; composition. (a) There is established a campaign spending
commission, which shall be placed within the department of accounting and
general services for administrative purposes.

(b) The commission shall consist of five
members representing the general public and who are appointed by the governor
from a list of ten nominees submitted by the judicial council. A vacancy on
the commission shall be filled from the list of nominees or by the
reappointment of a commissioner whose term has expired, subject to the limit on
length of service imposed by section 26-34. The judicial council shall meet
and expeditiously select additional persons for the list of nominees whenever the
number of the eligible nominees falls below five. Notwithstanding section
26-34, appointments to the commission shall not be subject to the advice and
consent of the senate.

(c) The judicial council may solicit
applications for the list of nominees through community organizations and
advertisements in any newspaper. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next